Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB973.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1556. Early Human Life Development Education.--(a) (1) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year and continuing each school year thereafter, each school entity shall provide early human life development instruction to students once during grade nine, ten, eleven or twelve. The early human life development instruction shall be integrated within the biology course of study required in accordance with the State Board of Education regulations.(2) The early human life development instruction under 1234567891011121314151617181920 paragraph (1) shall, at a minimum, include:(i) An ultrasound video at least five minutes in length showing human development of the brain, heart, sex organs and other vital organs at the following intervals:(A) Eight weeks' gestational age.(B) Twelve weeks' gestational age.(C) Seventeen weeks' gestational age.(D) Twenty-two weeks' gestational age.(E) Twenty-seven weeks' gestational age.(F) Thirty-two weeks' gestational age.(G) Thirty-seven weeks' gestational age.(ii) A presentation of a high-quality, computer-generated, animated rendering showing the process of fertilization and every stage of human development inside the uterus, noting significant markers in cell growth and organ development for every significant marker of pregnancy until birth.(iii) Age-appropriate instruction on the effects and harms of illegal drugs, narcotics, tobacco and alcohol on pregnancy, including potential harm to the fetus, risks of developmental disorders and the long-term health consequences for both mother and child.(b) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Gestational age." The age of an unborn child as calculated from the first day of the last menstrual period of the pregnant woman."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school."Ultrasound video." A video produced through the use of an 20250SB0973PN1114 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ultrasound machine which is of sufficient quality to be used in determining gestational age.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0973PN1114 - 3 - 123